District of Columbia statutes.
1-333.03

Repealed

Director of the Department of General Services.

Repealed.

July 1, 1882, 22 Stat. 139, ch. 263, § 1
Apr. 27, 1904, 33 Stat. 363, ch. 1628
Mar. 2, 1911, 36 Stat. 966, ch. 192
June 26, 1912, 37 Stat. 140, ch. 182
April 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 401, 44 DCR 1423
1981 Ed., § 1-364.
1973 Ed., § 1-304.